California, session 20252026, SB1222.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Career Technical Education Technical Assistance and Equity Pilot Program Act. SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Career technical education (CTE) is essential to California’s economic competitiveness and provides pupils with pathways to high-wage, high-demand careers. (b) Pupils with disabilities, English learners, and historically underserved populations are significantly underrepresented in CTE pathways, limiting their economic opportunities.(c) Many local educational agencies lack the capacity and resources to develop and implement high-quality, inclusive CTE programs that effectively serve all pupil populations.(d) The Orange County Department of Education has demonstrated successful statewide leadership in education systems improvement through its administration of the Multi-Tiered System of Support (MTSS) initiative and, most recently, through its designation as the statewide lead agency for charter school technical assistance, demonstrating proven capacity to coordinate large-scale technical assistance across diverse educational contexts.(e) The Orange County Department of Education, through its role as lead agency for the K–16 Strong Workforce Education and Training Collaborative, has developed and refined innovative models for coordinating CTE across K-12 and postsecondary systems, demonstrating the effectiveness of regional coordination through county offices of education.(f) The County of Orange’s close partnership with the Orange County Business Council, designated as the region’s California Jobs First lead agency, and deep integration with the Orange County Workforce Development Board, has resulted in effective strategies for braiding and leveraging multiple funding streams, including federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA) resources, aligning education and workforce development initiatives, and creating seamless pathways from education to employment. (g) The County of Orange’s success in securing WIOA funding as a direct service provider demonstrates the value of education-workforce integration, enabling the development of youth and nontraditional apprenticeship pipelines and strengthening the CTE teacher workforce through innovative credentialing programs that address critical teacher shortages.(h) The integration of K–16 educational collaboration with regional economic development through California Jobs First partnerships and workforce development board engagement represents a promising model for maximizing the impact of CTE investments and ensuring programs are responsive to labor market needs.(i) County offices of education are uniquely positioned to serve as regional coordinators for CTE technical assistance, providing support and capacity building to local educational agencies within their jurisdictions while maintaining strong connections to regional workforce development entities. (j) A pilot program approach will allow the state to test and refine technical assistance strategies that leverage the county office of education infrastructure and regional partnership model before considering broader implementation, using a tailored approach that meets regional needs and contexts rather than prescriptive mandates. (k) Data-driven decisionmaking and outcome tracking are essential to ensuring CTE programs effectively prepare pupils for career success.SEC. 3. Article 9 (commencing with Section 52480) is added to Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: Article 9. Career Technical Education Technical Assistance and Equity Pilot Program52480. The Career Technical Education Technical Assistance and Equity Pilot Program is hereby established. 52481. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “California Jobs First partnership” means a collaboration between educational agencies and regional economic development entities designated as lead agencies under the California Jobs First initiative to align education, workforce development, and economic development strategies. (b) “CTE” means career technical education.(c) “Historically underserved populations” include, but are not limited to, individuals with exceptional needs as defined in Section 56026, English learners as defined in Section 306, foster youth, homeless youth, and pupils from low-income families. (d) “Industry-education partnership” means a collaborative relationship between local educational agencies and employers, industry associations, labor organizations, or workforce development entities to align CTE programs with labor market needs.(e) “Lead agency” means the county office of education designated by the Superintendent pursuant to Section 52482 to administer the pilot program for CTE technical assistance and to coordinate services through participating county offices. (f) “Local educational agency” means a school district or charter school.(g) “Participating county office” means a county office of education located within a designated pilot region that receives technical assistance and support from the lead agency and provides direct services to local educational agencies within its jurisdiction. (h) “Pilot program” means the Career Technical Education Technical Assistance and Equity Pilot Program established pursuant to this article.(i) “Pilot region” means a geographic area designated by the Superintendent to participate in the pilot program established pursuant to this article.(j) “WIOA” means the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.(k) “Workforce development board” means a local workforce development board established pursuant to WIOA that coordinates workforce development activities and resources within a designated region.52482. (a) The Superintendent shall designate a county office of education to serve as the lead agency for administering a three-year pilot program to provide technical assistance in CTE, with a focus on equity and inclusion.(b) In selecting the lead agency, the Superintendent shall consider all of the following criteria:(1) Demonstrated experience in providing statewide or regional technical assistance to county offices of education and local educational agencies, including experience as a lead agency for statewide initiatives.(2) Proven track record in developing inclusive education programs that effectively serve historically underserved populations. (3) Experience serving as a lead agency or fiscal agent for statewide or regional initiatives, including, but not limited to, K-16 Strong Workforce Education and Training Collaboratives, statewide charter school technical assistance, or similar multisystem coordination efforts. (4) Established and effective partnerships with regional economic development entities, including California Jobs First lead agencies, workforce development boards, and industry consortia, with demonstrated ability to leverage these partnerships for program improvement and funding diversification.(5) Experience as a direct service provider using WIOA funding or other workforce development resources to create education-to-employment pathways. (6) Demonstrated capacity to braid and leverage multiple funding streams from federal, state, and regional sources to maximize program impact and sustainability.(7) Existing infrastructure and capacity to provide regional coordination and support services to other county offices of education, with experience in tailored technical assistance that responds to diverse regional needs and contexts rather than prescriptive mandates.(8) Experience in data collection, analysis, and reporting on pupil outcomes across multiple educational systems and agencies.(9) Track record of successful collaboration with the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges and other postsecondary partners to create aligned career pathways.(10) Demonstrated success in addressing critical workforce needs, including development of innovative programs to recruit, prepare, and credential CTE teachers and expand work-based learning opportunities such as youth apprenticeships and nontraditional apprenticeship pathways.(c) (1) The Superintendent shall designate two pilot regions to receive intensive technical assistance services, consistent with the following conditions:(A) One region shall be primarily urban in character, with high population density and diverse pupil demographics.(B) One region shall be primarily rural in character, with geographic challenges and limited access to specialized services.(2) In selecting pilot regions, the Superintendent shall prioritize areas with any of the following: (A) High proportions of historically underserved pupil populations.(B) Documented equity gaps in CTE access and outcomes.(C) Demonstrated local commitment to improving CTE programs.(D) Existing or emerging California Jobs First partnerships and active workforce development boards that can be leveraged to strengthen industry-education alignment.(E) Geographic and demographic diversity to ensure pilot findings are applicable across varied contexts.(d) The designation of the lead agency and pilot regions shall be for a term of three years.52483. The lead agency designated pursuant to Section 52482 shall do all of the following:(a) Further develop and disseminate exemplary models for inclusive CTE pathways that effectively serve pupils with disabilities, English learners, and other historically underserved populations, including all of the following: (1) Universal design for learning approaches in CTE instruction.(2) Accommodations and modifications that maintain industry standards while ensuring accessibility.(3) Integrated support services that enable full participation in CTE programs.(4) Strategies for recruiting and retaining underrepresented pupils in CTE pathways.(b) Create scalable frameworks and toolkits for industry-education partnerships that can be replicated across diverse regions of the state, including all of the following:(1) Model partnership agreements and governance structures that align with California Jobs First regional planning processes and workforce development board strategic plans.(2) Work-based learning continuum from career exploration to youth apprenticeship, nontraditional apprenticeship, and registered apprenticeship programs.(3) Employer engagement strategies that emphasize diversity and inclusion.(4) Regional collaboration models that leverage economic development initiatives and braid multiple funding sources, including WIOA resources.(5) Strategies for integrating K–16 educational collaboration with regional workforce development efforts and workforce development board initiatives.(c) Develop and disseminate strategies for addressing critical CTE workforce needs, including all of the following:(1) Models for recruiting and preparing CTE teachers, including innovative credentialing pathways.(2) Partnerships with workforce development boards and industry partners to create teacher recruitment pipelines for industry professionals.(3) Strategies for supporting CTE teacher retention and ongoing professional development.(d) Establish and maintain a data system to track career pathway outcomes within the pilot regions, with particular attention to outcomes for historically underserved pupil groups, including all of the following: (1) CTE pathway enrollment and completion rates disaggregated by pupil demographics.(2) Credential, certificate, and industry-recognized certification attainment.(3) Postsecondary enrollment and completion in aligned programs.(4) Employment outcomes and wage data, where available, in coordination with workforce development board data systems.(5) Employer satisfaction with program completers.(6) Work-based learning participation rates, including apprenticeship enrollment and completion.(e) Provide technical assistance, capacity building, and coordination support to participating county offices within the designated pilot regions, which shall in turn provide direct services to local educational agencies within their respective jurisdictions. Services shall be tailored to regional needs, climate, and culture, meeting participating county offices where they are, and supporting documented improvement in implementation strategies. Services shall include all of the following: (1) Training and professional development for participating county office staff who support CTE programs.(2) Model frameworks and resources that participating county offices can adapt for their local contexts.(3) Facilitation of regional professional learning communities that bring together participating county office and local educational agency staff.(4) Coordination of connections between participating county offices and regional industry partners, workforce development boards, and California Jobs First lead agencies.(5) Support for establishing data collection and outcome tracking systems at the county level.(6) Assistance in developing county-level strategies for braiding and leveraging multiple funding streams to support CTE programs, including accessing WIOA resources and other workforce development funding.(7) Support for participating county offices in developing partnerships with local workforce development boards and becoming direct service providers where appropriate.(f) Support for participating county offices in providing direct technical assistance to local educational agencies within their jurisdictions in implementing high-quality, equitable CTE programs, including all of the following:(1) Regional training institutes and professional learning communities.(2) Onsite coaching and consultation for program development and improvement.(3) Access to curriculum resources and instructional materials designed for diverse learners.(4) Assistance in establishing and strengthening industry advisory committees.(5) Support for CTE program approval and quality assurance processes.(6) Guidance on developing work-based learning opportunities, including youth and nontraditional apprenticeships.(g) Collaborate with the department, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, California Jobs First regional lead agencies, workforce development boards, and other relevant state and regional agencies to ensure alignment of career pathways from secondary through postsecondary education and into the workforce. (h) Develop and maintain a public-facing internet website with resources, promising practices, and pilot program data on CTE equity and access.(i) Submit an annual report to the Superintendent, the Governor, and the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before December 1 of each year, detailing all of the following: (1) Activities and services provided to participating county offices and, through them, to local educational agencies within the pilot regions.(2) Progress toward increasing participation of historically underserved populations in CTE within pilot regions.(3) Outcome data on CTE pathway completion and postprogram success within pilot regions.(4) Promising practices and lessons learned from pilot implementation, with particular attention to the effectiveness of the tailored, regionally responsive participating county office coordination model and strategies for leveraging California Jobs First partnerships and workforce development board collaborations.(5) Examples of successful funding braiding and leveraging strategies that maximize program impact, including integration of WIOA and other workforce development resources.(6) Progress in addressing CTE teacher workforce needs and expanding work-based learning opportunities.(7) Recommendations for program refinement and potential expansion beyond pilot regions.(8) Use of allocated funds and fiscal accountability measures.52484. (a) County offices of education within designated pilot regions are encouraged to participate as participating county offices in the technical assistance services provided by the lead agency. (b) Participating county offices shall do all of the following: (1) Designate staff to coordinate CTE technical assistance within their jurisdiction. (2) Participate in capacity-building activities and professional learning opportunities provided by the lead agency.(3) Provide direct technical assistance and support to local educational agencies within their jurisdiction, tailored to local needs and contexts.(4) Facilitate connections between local educational agencies and regional industry partners, including California Jobs First lead agencies, workforce development boards, and employers.(5) Explore opportunities to partner with local workforce development boards and access WIOA or other workforce development funding to support CTE initiatives.(6) Participate in data collection and reporting as requested by the lead agency.(7) Share promising practices and lessons learned with the lead agency and other participating county offices.(c) The lead agency shall prioritize support to participating county offices serving high proportions of historically underserved populations or demonstrating significant equity gaps in CTE access and outcomes.(d) Participation in technical assistance services is voluntary for local educational agencies within the designated pilot regions.(e) Participating county offices shall prioritize services to local educational agencies serving high proportions of historically underserved populations or demonstrating significant equity gaps in CTE access and outcomes. (f) Local educational agencies receiving direct technical assistance from their county office shall do all of the following: (1) Participate in data collection and reporting as requested by the participating county office and lead agency.(2) Share promising practices and lessons learned with other agencies. (3) Commit to implementing recommendations and improvement strategies developed through the technical assistance process. 52485. (a) The Career Technical Education Technical Assistance and Equity Pilot Program established pursuant to this article shall be funded through an annual appropriation in the Budget Act for the duration of the three-year pilot period.(b) Funds appropriated for purposes of this article shall be allocated to the lead agency designated pursuant to Section 52482.(c) The lead agency may expend allocated funds for any of the following purposes:(1) Personnel costs for staff providing technical assistance services and coordination support within pilot regions.(2) Subcontracts or allocations to participating county offices to support their provision of direct services to local educational agencies.(3) Development of resources, toolkits, and training materials.(4) Regional training institutes and professional learning opportunities for participating county office staff and local educational agency participants.(5) Data system development, maintenance, and analysis for pilot regions.(6) Research and evaluation of promising practices in inclusive CTE.(7) Coordination and collaboration with state agencies, California Jobs First lead agencies, workforce development boards, and external partners.(8) Administrative costs, not to exceed 5 percent of the total allocation.(d) The lead agency shall maintain detailed fiscal records and shall be subject to audit by the California State Auditor. (e) The lead agency and participating county offices are encouraged to pursue and leverage additional funding sources, including federal grants such as WIOA, philanthropic support, and partnerships with California Jobs First initiatives and workforce development boards, to maximize program impact and demonstrate sustainability strategies.52486. (a) The Superintendent shall designate the lead agency and pilot regions pursuant to Section 52482 no later than six months following the effective date of this article.(b) The lead agency shall commence providing services no later than the beginning of the fiscal year following designation.(c) The first annual report required under subdivision (i) of Section 52483 shall be submitted by December 1 of the first full fiscal year of implementation.52487. (a) No later than six months before the conclusion of the three-year pilot period, the lead agency shall submit a comprehensive evaluation report to the Superintendent, the Governor, and the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that includes all of the following:(1) A detailed analysis of pilot program outcomes, including quantitative data on pupil participation and success rates.(2) Cost-benefit analysis of the technical assistance model, including analysis of the effectiveness and efficiency of the tailored, regionally responsive participating county office coordination structure. (3) Feedback from participating county offices, local educational agencies, industry partners, California Jobs First lead agencies, workforce development boards, and other stakeholders. (4) Assessment of the effectiveness of strategies for braiding and leveraging multiple funding streams, including WIOA and other workforce development resources.(5) Evaluation of the impact of California Jobs First partnerships and workforce development board collaborations on CTE program quality and alignment with regional labor market needs.(6) Analysis of progress in addressing CTE teacher workforce needs and expanding work-based learning opportunities, including apprenticeships.(7) Identification of successful strategies and areas requiring modification. (8) Comparison of the tailored, regionally responsive technical assistance approach with more prescriptive models, including lessons learned about effectiveness in diverse contexts.(9) Recommendations regarding whether the program should be expanded statewide, continued as a pilot, modified, or discontinued.(10) If expansion is recommended, a proposed implementation timeline, estimated costs for statewide services, and recommended structure for scaling the county office of education coordination model while maintaining regional responsiveness. (b) The evaluation report shall be posted on the lead agency’s public-facing internet website.52488. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. The sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to the lead agency designated pursuant to Section 52482 of the Education Code for purposes of implementing the Career Technical Education Technical Assistance and Equity Pilot Program pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 52480) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code for the 2026–27 fiscal year.SEC. 5. If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.